Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 5 Miscellaneous Offenses and Penalties

Cross references.

General prohibition against unjust discrimination in freight-transportation rates by common carriers, §

46-9-52

.

46-2-90.
Liability of companies subject to jurisdiction of commission generally; venue for actions generally; award of attorney’s fee.

If any company under the jurisdiction of the commission does, causes to be done, or permits to be done any act which is prohibited, forbidden, or declared to be unlawful, or fails to do any act which is required either by a law of this state or by an order of the commission, such company shall be liable to the persons affected thereby for all loss, damage, or injury caused thereby or resulting therefrom. An action to recover for such loss, damage, or injury may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction by any such person. In case of recovery, if the jury finds that such act or failure to act was willful, it may fix a reasonable attorney’s fee, which shall be taxed and collected as part of the costs of the case.

History.

Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 9; Civil Code 1910, § 2666; Code 1933, § 93-415.

Law reviews.

For article advocating that payment of attorneys fees be assigned to the losing party, see 18 Ga. B.J. 439 (1956).

For annual survey of recent developments, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 473 (1986).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (2017).

46-2-91.
Penalties recoverable before commission; superior court filing of certain commission orders; venue; effect of judgment.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, any person, firm, or corporation (referred to in this Code section as a “utility”) subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, which utility willfully violates any law administered by the commission or any duly promulgated regulation issued thereunder or which fails, neglects, or refuses to comply with any order after notice thereof, shall be liable to a penalty not to exceed $15,000.00 for such violation and an additional penalty not to exceed $10,000.00 for each day during which such violation continues.

Any operator which violates any rule or regulation of the commission prescribed pursuant to subsection (i) of Code Section 46-2-20, or which fails, neglects, or refuses to comply with any order after notice thereof, shall be liable to a penalty not to exceed the maximum penalties provided for in 49 C.F.R. Section 190.223. As used in this subsection, the term “operator” means any person who engages in the transportation of natural gas by pipeline.

The commission, after a hearing conducted after not less than 30 days’ notice, shall determine whether any utility has willfully violated any law administered by the commission or any duly promulgated regulation issued thereunder, or has failed, neglected, or refused to comply with any order of the commission. Upon an appropriate finding of a violation, the commission may impose by order such civil penalties as are provided by either subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section, but not both. In each such proceeding, the commission shall maintain a record as provided in paragraph (8) of subsection (a) of Code Section 50-13-13 including all pleadings, a transcript of proceedings, a statement of each matter of which the commission takes official notice, and all staff memoranda or data submitted to the commission in connection with its consideration of the case. All penalties and interest thereon (at the rate of 10 percent per annum) recovered by the commission shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury.

Any party aggrieved by a decision of the commission may seek judicial review as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section.

Any party who has exhausted all administrative remedies available before the commission and who is aggrieved by a final decision of the commission in a proceeding described in subsection (c) of this Code section may seek judicial review of the final order of the commission in the Superior Court of Fulton County.

Proceedings for review shall be instituted by filing a petition within 30 days after the service of the final decision of the commission or, if a rehearing is requested, within 30 days after the decision thereon. A motion for rehearing or reconsideration after a final decision by the commission shall not be a prerequisite to the filing of a petition for review. Copies of the petition shall be served upon the commission and all parties of record before the commission.

The petition shall state the nature of the petitioner’s interest, the facts showing that the petitioner is aggrieved by the decision, and the ground, as specified in paragraph (6) of this subsection, upon which the petitioner contends that the decision should be reversed. The petition may be amended by leave of court.

Within 30 days after service of the petition, or within such further time as is stipulated by the parties or as is allowed by the court, the agency shall transmit to the reviewing court the original or a certified copy of the entire record of the proceedings under review. By stipulation of all parties to the review proceedings, the record may be shortened. A party unreasonably refusing to stipulate that the record be limited may be taxed for the additional costs. The court may require or permit subsequent corrections or additions to the record.

If, before the date set for hearing, application is made to the court for leave to present additional evidence, and it is shown to the satisfaction of the court that the additional evidence is material and there were good reasons for failure to present it in the proceedings before the agency, the court may order that the additional evidence be taken before the commission upon such procedure as is determined by the court. The commission may modify its findings and decision by reason of the additional evidence and shall file that evidence and any modifications, new findings, or decisions with the reviewing court.

The review shall be conducted by the court without a jury and shall be confined to the record. The court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the commission as to the weight of the evidence on questions of fact. The court may affirm the decision of the commission or remand the case for further proceedings. The court may reverse the decision of the commission if substantial rights of the petitioner have been prejudiced because the commission’s findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:

In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;

In excess of the statutory authority of the commission;

Made upon unlawful procedure;

Clearly not supported by any reliable, probative, and substantial evidence on the record as a whole; or

Arbitrary or capricious.

A party aggrieved by an order of the court in a proceeding authorized under subsection (c) of this Code section may appeal to the Supreme Court of Georgia or to the Court of Appeals of Georgia in accordance with Article 2 of Chapter 6 of Title 5, the “Appellate Practice Act.”

The commission may file in the superior court in the county in which the person under order resides or in the county in which the violation occurred or, if the person is a corporation, in the county in which the corporation maintains its principal place of business a certified copy of a final order of the commission unappealed or of a final order of the commission affirmed upon appeal, whereupon the court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. The judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though the judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by the court.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-309.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 677, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1640, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 708, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 366, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 708, § 1/SB 210; Ga. L. 2020, p. 358, § 1/HB 972.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, deleted “or by subsection (a) of Code Section 46-2-94” following “this Code section” at the end of the second sentence in paragraph (b)(1).

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added subsection (d).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, substituted “Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, any” for “Any” at the beginning of subsection (a); added subsection (b); redesignated former subsections (b) through (d) as present subsections (c) through (e), respectively; substituted “provided by either subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section, but not both” for “provided by subsection (a) of this Code section” at the end of the second sentence of paragraph (c)(1); substituted “subsection (d)” for “subsection (c)” near the end of paragraph (c)(2); substituted “subsection (c)” for “subsection (b)” in the middle of paragraph (d)(1); and substituted “subsection (c)” for “subsection (b)” in the middle of paragraph (d)(7).

46-2-92.
Penalties recoverable by state through civil action.

Every company under the jurisdiction of the commission, and all officers, agents, and employees of every such company, shall obey, observe, and comply with every order made by the commission under authority of law. Any company under the jurisdiction of the commission, or any officer, agent, or employee thereof, who or which violates any provision of this Code section, or who or which fails, omits, or neglects to obey, observe, and comply with any rule, regulation, order, direction, or requirement of the commission, shall forfeit to the state a sum of not more than $5,000.00 for each offense, the amount to be fixed by the presiding judge. Every violation of this Code section or any other Code section, or of any rule, regulation, order, direction, or requirement of the commission shall be a separate and distinct offense; in case of a continued violation, every day a violation thereof takes place shall be deemed a separate and distinct offense.

An action for the recovery of the penalty provided in subsection (a) of this Code section may be brought in the county of the principal office in this state of such company, or in the county of the state where such violation occurs and such wrong is perpetrated, or in any county in this state through which the company operates. Where the violation consists of an excessive charge for the carriage of freight or passengers or for any other service rendered, as such violation is described in Code Section 46-9-250, an action may be brought in any county in which the charges are made, or through which counties it was intended that such passengers or freight should have been carried, or through which counties such company operates. Any action pursuant to this Code section shall be brought in the name of the state by direction of the Governor.

Any proceeding to enforce the penalty provided in subsection (a) of this Code section may be tried at the first term of the court to which it is brought and shall be given precedence over other business by the presiding judge. The court shall not be adjourned until such proceeding is legally continued or disposed of. The decision in such case may be taken to the Court of Appeals as in other cases.

History.

Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 12; Civil Code 1910, § 2667; Code 1933, § 93-416; Ga. L. 1946, p. 726, § 1.

46-2-93.
Criminal penalty; venue for actions; calling of agents and employees of company as witnesses; use of testimony against agents and employees.

Every officer, agent, or employee of any company under the jurisdiction of the commission who violates or procures, aids, or abets any violation by any such company of any provision of this title; or who fails to obey, observe, or comply with any order of the commission; or who aids or abets any such company in its failure to obey, observe, and comply with any such order, direction, or provision, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Such officer, agent, or employee shall be subject to prosecution in any county in which the company or the officer, agent, or employee violates any provision of this title or any provision of any order of the commission, or in any county through which the company operates. Such officer, agent, or employee shall also be subject to prosecution under this title in any county in which a subordinate agent or employee of the company violates any provision of this title, by the approval or direction, or in consequence of the approval or direction, of such officer, agent, or employee; and the agent or employee who locally in any county violates the rules or directions of said commission pursuant to the direction or authority of a superior officer may be called as a witness and be compelled to testify as to the authority by which he acted. Such testimony shall not be used against such subordinate employee or agent, nor shall he thereafter be subject to prosecution for said offense.

History.

Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 13; Civil Code 1910, § 2668; Penal Code 1910, § 527; Code 1933, § 93-9901; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

Cross references.

Prohibition against compelled self-incrimination, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. XVI.

46-2-94.
[Reserved] Operation as household goods carrier for hire without having valid certificate prohibited.

History.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 1640, § 2; repealed by Ga. L. 2004, p. 366, § 2, effective July 1, 2004.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 366, § 2 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2004.

46-2-95.
Civil actions; standard for obtaining an injunction.

The commission may bring a civil action to enjoin the violation of any law administered by the commission or any rule, order, or regulation established by the commission. It shall not be necessary to allege or prove that there is no adequate remedy at law to obtain an injunction under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-2-95

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 5.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 25, 2002.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 enactment of this chapter, see 19 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 285 (2002).